Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 6 Legislative Ethics

Editor’s notes.

The former part consisted of Code Sections 45-10-90 through 45-10-94, relating to the Joint Legislative Ethics Committee, and was based on Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 26/HB 48; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 29/SB 17, effective January 10, 2011.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Act applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

45-10-90.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Abuse of official power” means threatening to use the powers or personnel of a state entity for personal purposes of coercion, retaliation, or punishment.

“Clerical officer” means the Clerk of the House of Representatives or the Secretary of the Senate.

“Committee” means the House Committee on Ethics or the Senate Ethics Committee.

“Conflict of interest” means an individual has multiple interests and uses his or her official position to exploit, in some way, his or her position for his or her own direct, unique, pecuniary, and personal benefit.

“Employee” means any person who is employed by the legislative branch of state government.

“Improper conduct” means a member of the General Assembly:

Engages in conduct that is a conflict of interest;

Engages in conduct that is an abuse of official power; or

Illegally uses an employee in a political campaign.

“Member of the General Assembly” means any person elected and certified as a member of the General Assembly.

“Sexual harassment” means making sexual advances, requesting sexual favors, or other verbal or physical conduct of a sexual nature when:

Submission to such conduct is made explicitly or implicitly a term or condition of an individual’s employment;

Submission to or rejection of such conduct by an individual is used as a basis for employment decisions affecting the employee; or

Such conduct interferes with the employee’s work performance or creates an intimidating, hostile, or offensive work environment.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 29/SB 17.

45-10-91.
Method of addressing improper conduct.

Any person may file a complaint with the clerical officer of the appropriate chamber alleging improper conduct involving a member of the General Assembly. Any employee may file a complaint with the clerical officer of the appropriate chamber alleging sexual harassment by a member of the General Assembly. The clerical officer shall designate the place where such complaints may be filed, provide instruction necessary to properly submit a complaint, and prescribe forms for such complainants. Complaints shall be submitted in writing and verified under oath to the best information, knowledge, and belief of such person. The complaint shall include a statement by the complainant as to whether or not in filing the complaint he or she is acting as an agent, paid or otherwise, for any other person. Any person who knowingly provides false information in executing a complaint under this Code section commits the offense of false swearing within the meaning of Code Section 16-10-71.

The clerical officer shall forward, within one business day of receipt, the original complaint and all materials appended to such complaint in a confidential report to the presiding officer of the appropriate chamber and to the chairperson of the House Committee on Ethics or the chairperson of the Senate Ethics Committee, as appropriate.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-91

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 29/SB 17; Ga. L. 2013, p. 540, § 8/HB 142.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 amendment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 129 (2013).

45-10-92.
Abuse of power and improper use of state employees by General Assembly members.

The committee shall serve the person against whom any complaint is made a copy of the complaint by hand delivery or statutory overnight delivery or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, within five business days of the committee’s receipt of such complaint.

The committee shall conduct a preliminary investigation of the merits of such complaint. If a complaint alleges a violation by one of the members of the committee, such member shall recuse himself or herself. If there are found no reasonable grounds to believe that improper conduct or sexual harassment has occurred, the complaint shall be dismissed, subject to being reopened upon discovery of additional evidence or relevant material. The committee shall not be required to conduct a hearing if there are no reasonable grounds to believe that improper conduct or sexual harassment has occurred. If the committee determines that there are such reasonable grounds to believe that improper conduct or sexual harassment has occurred, it shall give notice by summoning the persons believed to have committed the violation to a hearing. The rules of the committee shall be invoked if a hearing occurs. The committee may report suspected violations of law to the appropriate law enforcement authority.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit or encumber the right of the committee to initiate on probable cause an investigation on its own cognizance as it deems necessary to fulfill its obligations to investigate improper conduct or sexual harassment.

The committee shall adopt a retention standard for complaints and documents attached thereto.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-92

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 29/SB 17.